Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1305
Venue; crime committed on county line.

When an offense shall be committed on a county line, the trial may be in either county divided by such line; and where any offense shall be committed against the person of another, and the person committing the offense shall be in one county, and the person receiving the injury shall be in another county, the trial may be had in either of such counties.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 424, p. 819;

R.S.1913, § 9028;

C.S.1922, § 10052;

C.S.1929, § 29-1305;

R.S.1943, § 29-1305.

Where an offense is committed on a county line, prosecution may be in either of the counties divided by such line. State v. Lindsey, 193 Neb. 442, 227 N.W.2d 599 (1975).